Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 9 Secret or Benevolent Societies [Repealed]

§§ 17-9-101 through 17-9-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 3.

Cross references. —

For the Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act, see chapter 19 of this title, especially §

17-19-1801

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 34, Tit. III, §§ 1 through 6, related to the incorporation, powers and dissolution of secret or benevolent societies.

§§ 17-9-107 and 17-9-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 206, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to real and personal property of nonprofit associations, see §

17-22-104

. As to liability in tort and contract of nonprofit associations, see §

17-22-106

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 34, Tit. III, §§ 7 and 8, related to the acquisition and disposition of property by societies not incorporating under this chapter, and suits by or against unincorporated societies relative to rights and property, respectively.